Illinois, session 104th, SB1154.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Council of State Governments Act is amended 5by changing Section 3-5 as follows: 6    (25 ILCS 166/3-5)7    Sec. 3-5. Short title. This Article may be cited as the the 8Council of State Governments Act. As used in this Article, 9"this Act" refers to this Article.10(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23.)